District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.09

Posting requirement.

(a)

The Mayor shall prescribe, and the Mayor shall provide to employers, and an employer shall post and maintain in a conspicuous place, a notice that sets forth excerpts from or summaries of the pertinent provisions of this chapter and information that pertains to the filing of a complaint under this chapter. The notice shall be published in all languages spoken by 3% of or 500 individuals in the District of Columbia population, whichever is less.

(b)

(1)

An employer who violates this section shall be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $100 for each day that the employer fails to post the notice; provided, that the total penalty shall not exceed $500 unless the ongoing violation is willful.

(2)

No liability for failure to post notice will arise under this section if the Mayor has failed to provide to the business the notice required by this section.

(c)

An employer shall post the notice in English and all languages spoken by employees with Limited or no-English Proficiency, as defined in § 2-1931(5).

(d)

Employers shall be furnished copies or summaries of this chapter prepared by the Mayor on request.

History

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 10, 55 DCR 3452
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 311(b), 56 DCR 1117
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-89, § 2(e), 61 DCR 317

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-131.12.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353, in subsec. (a), deleted “in languages in accordance with subchapter II of Chapter 19 of Title 2,” following “provide to employers,”.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-89 rewrote (b)(1).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-89: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7003, effective Feb. 26, 2015.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.